Nebraska, session 109, LB997.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB997 LB997
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 73-815, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
73-815 Except as provided in section 73-813, all proposals for sole
source contracts for services in excess of fifty thousand dollars shall
be preapproved by the division except in emergencies. In case of an
emergency, contract approval by the state agency director or his or her
designee is required. Copies A copy of the contract and state agency
justification of the emergency shall be provided to the Director of
Administrative Services and the Auditor of Public Accounts within three
business days after contract approval. The state agency shall retain a
copy of the justification with the contract in the state agency files.
The Director of Administrative Services shall maintain a complete record
of such sole source contracts for services.
Sec. 2. Original section 73-815, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-